Utah statutes.
48-2e-1121.   Merger authorized.

(1)  By complying with Sections 48-2e-1121 through 48-2e-1126:

(a)  one or more domestic limited partnerships may merge with one or more domestic or foreign entities into a domestic or foreign surviving entity; and

(b)  two or more foreign entities may merge into a domestic limited partnership.

(2)  By complying with the provisions of Sections 48-2e-1121 through 48-2e-1126 applicable to foreign entities, a foreign entity may be a party to a merger under Sections 48-2e-1121 through 48-2e-1126 or may be the surviving entity in such a merger if the merger is authorized by the law of the foreign entity's jurisdiction of formation.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

